Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.864

Faculty tenure—Appeal from decision for dismissal—Procedure.

Any faculty member dismissed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 shall have a right to appeal the final decision of the appointing authority in accordance with RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

[ 1989 c 175 s 80; 1973 c 62 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 42. Formerly RCW 28.85.864.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.